Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202684-321
Auditor of Public Accounts Cash Fund; created; use; investment.

There is hereby created in the office of the Auditor of Public Accounts a cash fund to be known as the Auditor of Public Accounts Cash Fund. The fund shall be used for payment for services performed by the Auditor of Public Accounts for state agencies, political subdivisions, and grantees of federal funds disbursed by a receiving agency for which he or she is entitled to reimbursement on a contractual or other basis for such reimbursement. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 1972, LB 1283, § 1;

Laws 1976, LB 759, § 3;

Laws 2017, LB151, § 11;

Laws 2026, LB1072, § 214.
April 8, 2026
Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.